Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB119.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, any world history or world civilization
course offered by a public middle or high school that is not an advanced
placement course shall include instruction on African history relevant to the time
period covered by the course, including but not limited to the following
civilizations:
(a) The Kingdoms of Kush, Kongo, Punt, Benin, Zulu, Berber, Mutapa, and
Zimbabwe; and
(b) The Mali, Songhai, Carthage, Ghana, Asante, Ethiopian, Aksumite, and
Egyptian Empires.
(2) (a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, any United States history course
offered by a public middle or high school that is not an advanced placement
course and includes instruction on the founding of the United States shall
also include instruction on Native American culture and history prior to
and after the founding of the United States.
(b) The Native American instruction required by this subsection shall include
but not be limited to instruction on the history and culture of the indigenous
peoples of the Eastern Woodlands, Great Basin, Plains, Southwest, Mission
Indians, Northwest Coast, Alaska, and Pacific Islands.
(3) The department shall collaborate with:
(a) The Kentucky Center for African-American Heritage to develop an elective
high school course offering in African history; and
(b) The Kentucky Native American Heritage Commission to develop an elective
high school course offering in Native American history.
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 12/26/2024 9:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 469
(4) In accordance with KRS 156.160, the board shall promulgate administrative
regulations establishing academic standards for:
(a) African history instruction required by subsection (1) of this section
developed in collaboration with the Kentucky Center for African-American
Heritage; and
(b) Native American history instruction required by subsection (2) of this
section developed in collaboration with the Kentucky Native American
Heritage Commission.
(5) The superintendent of each school district shall determine curricula for course
offerings pursuant to KRS 160.345 that include the instruction required by
subsections (1) and (2) of this section and are aligned with the academic
standards required by subsection (4) of this section.
(6) The department shall collaborate with the Kentucky Center for African-American
Heritage to develop:
(a) Recommended curricula for the African history instruction required by
subsection (1) of this section that are aligned with the academic standards
required by subsection (4)(a) of this section;
(b) Historical instruction guidelines that provide direction to public middle and
high schools in implementing the academic standards for African history
instruction required by subsection (4)(a) of this section; and
(c) Professional development materials to prepare public middle and high
school instructors to provide the African history instruction described in
this section.
(7) The department shall collaborate with the Kentucky Native American Heritage
Commission to develop:
(a) Recommended curricula for the Native American history instruction
required by subsection (2) of this section that are aligned with the academic
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 12/26/2024 9:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 469
standards required by subsection (4)(b) of this section;
(b) Historical instruction guidelines that provide direction to public middle and
high schools in implementing the academic standards for Native American
history instruction required by subsection (4)(b) of this section; and
(c) Professional development materials to prepare public middle and high
school instructors to provide the Native American history instruction
described in this section.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 12/26/2024 9:01 AM Jacketed